Louisiana, session 2026, HB1208.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:71(Section heading) and (C) through (E) are hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 32:71(F) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§71. Driving on right side of road; exceptions; citations
* * *
C.(1) Any law enforcement officer whose vehicle is equipped with a fleet
camera system may record any vehicle in violation of this Section, only on multilane
highways, for purposes of issuing a citation. The cameras shall record the violation
for the purpose of issuing a citation without requiring the law enforcement officer
to pull over the vehicle.
(2) The video capturing the violation shall include audio and visual
recording.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-382 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1208
(3) Citations issued pursuant to this Subsection may be issued by mail and
provide for an administrative hearing process for the driver to appeal the citation
violation.
(4) Citations issued pursuant to this Subsection shall contain on the back of
the citation an attestation wherein the driver who receives the violation can attest
either that at the time of the violation, the person who received the notice of violation
was not the owner of the vehicle or that the vehicle was in the care, custody, and
control of another at the time of the violation. Nothing in this Paragraph shall
require that the owner's attestation be notarized. The driver who receives the
violation shall have the option to provide information on who was the owner or
driver of the vehicle at the time of the violation but shall not be required to do so.
(5) All fines collected for violations pursuant to this Subsection shall be paid
to the Louisiana office of state police.
(6) For purposes of this Subsection, "fleet camera system" means a network
of law enforcement vehicle-mounted cameras that capture, store, and analyze video
and audio footage while the vehicle is in motion or at rest.
C. D. The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor
vehicles, is directed to include a summary of this Section in any instructional
publication for drivers.
D. E. The Department of Transportation and Development is directed to
place signs on multilane highways, in an effort to make motorists aware of the
provisions provided for in this Section.
E. F. The Louisiana Highway Safety Commission and the Department of
Transportation and Development are directed to cooperatively develop and engage
a public awareness campaign to notify motorists of the provisions of this Section.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-382 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1208